Maryland, session 2025, SB0156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
(a) There is a Workgroup on Universal Newborn Nurse Home Visiting Services
in the State.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee; and
(4) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of the Maryland Hospital Association;
(ii) one representative each from:
1. The Family Tree for Baltimore City;
2. Family Connects Frederick; and
3. Family Connects Prince George’s; and
(iii) two members representing private insurance carriers.
(ii) one representative from each certified site in the State
implementing an evidence–based universal nurse home visiting model for families with
newborns;

SENATE BILL 156 3
(iii) one representative from an organization in the State
implementing at least two approved Maternal, Infant, and Early Childhood Home Visiting
models;
(iv) one representative of a private insurance carrier;
(v) one representative of the Maryland Nurses Association;
(vi) one representative of B’More for Health Babies Initiative;
(vii) one representative from a local health department;
(viii) one pediatrician licensed in the State;
(ix) one nurse midwife licensed in the State;
(x) one obstetrician licensed in the State; and
(xi) one representative of a federally qualified health center.
(c) The members of the Workgroup shall designate the chair and vice chair of the
Workgroup.
(d) The Maryland Family Network, in collaboration with the Maryland
Department of Health shall, may provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) compile updated patient data and expenditures per patient from the
Family Connect Programs currently operating in the State;
(2) compare other maternal and newborn health programs in the State and
in other states to the Family Connect Programs; and
(3) identify service gaps between the Family Connect Programs and
similar programs and potential funding sources to close the gaps.
(1) compile updated participant data and expenditures per participant from
the home visiting for families with newborns programs currently operating in the State;

SENATE BILL 156
(2) compare the data for home visiting for families with newborns programs
in the State to the data for evidence–based models for universal nurse home visiting for
families with newborns;
(3) (i) identify service gaps between the evidence–based models for
universal nurse home visiting for families with newborns and operational home visiting for
families with newborns programs;
(ii) identify opportunities to align the evidence–based models for
universal nurse home visiting for families with newborns with operational home visiting for
families with newborns programs operating in the State; and
(iii) identify potential funding sources to close the identified service
gaps; and
(4) identify workforce needs, including issues related to cultural
competency, for the evidence–based models for universal newborn nurse home visiting for
families with newborns and recommendations to address the workforce needs.
(g) On or before December 31, 2025, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 55. UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING PROGRAM.
13–5501.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE STATEWIDE PROGRAM TO
PROVIDE UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES IMPLEMENTED
UNDER § 13–5502(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
13–5502.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGN, IMPLEMENT, AND MAINTAIN A
VOLUNTARY STATEWIDE PROGRAM TO PROVIDE UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE
HOME VISITING SERVICES TO ALL FAMILIES WITH NEWBORNS RESIDING IN THE
STATE.
(2) THE PURPOSES OF THE PROGRAM ARE TO:
(I) SUPPORT HEALTHY CHILD DEVELOPMENT AND
POSTPARTUM HEALTH; AND
(II) STRENGTHEN FAMILIES.

SENATE BILL 156 5
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGN THE UNIVERSAL NEWBORN
NURSE HOME VISITING PROGRAM TO BE FLEXIBLE SO AS TO MEET THE NEEDS OF
THE COMMUNITIES IN WHICH THE PROGRAM OPERATES.
(B) IN DESIGNING THE PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT,
COORDINATE, AND COLLABORATE, AS NECESSARY, WITH:
(1) INSURERS THAT OFFER HEALTH BENEFITS PLANS IN THE STATE;
(2) HOSPITALS;
(3) LOCAL PUBLIC HEALTH AUTHORITIES;
(4) THE DIVISION OF EARLY CHILDHOOD IN THE DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION;
(5) EXISTING EARLY CHILDHOOD AND UNIVERSAL NEWBORN HOME
VISITING PROGRAMS;
(6) COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATIONS;
(7) A NATIONAL TRAINING INSTITUTE FOR UNIVERSAL NEWBORN
HOME VISITING;
(8) SOCIAL SERVICES PROVIDERS; AND
(9) ANY OTHER EXPERTS, GROUPS, OR ORGANIZATIONS AS THE
SECRETARY DETERMINES APPROPRIATE.
(C) THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES THAT
ARE:
(1) IDENTIFIED AS AN EVIDENCE–BASED EARLY CHILDHOOD HOME
VISITING SERVICE DELIVERY MODEL UNDER THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES;
(2) SUPPORTED BY A NATIONAL CENTER THAT PROVIDES TRAINING,
MONITORING, AND TECHNICAL SUPPORT;
(3) PROVIDED BY A COMMUNITY LEAD AGENCY DESIGNATED TO
SERVE A DEFINED COMMUNITY;
(4) PROVIDED BY REGISTERED NURSES LICENSED IN THE STATE;

SENATE BILL 156
(5) OFFERED TO:
(I) FAMILIES CARING FOR NEWBORNS UP TO THE AGE OF 12
WEEKS, INCLUDING FOSTER AND ADOPTIVE NEWBORNS; AND
(II) BIRTHING INDIVIDUALS WITHIN 12 WEEKS AFTER
DELIVERY OF A LIVE BIRTH OR STILLBIRTH;
(6) PROVIDED:
(I) IN THE FAMILY’S HOME; OR
(II) VIRTUALLY; AND
(7) AIMED AT IMPROVING OUTCOMES IN ONE OR MORE OF THE
FOLLOWING DOMAINS;
(I) INFANT AND CHILD HEALTH;
(II) CHILD DEVELOPMENT AND SCHOOL READINESS;
(III) MATERNAL AND POSTPARTUM HEALTH;
(IV) FAMILY ECONOMIC SELF–SUFFICIENCY;
(V) POSITIVE PARENTING;
(VI) REDUCING CHILD MALTREATMENT; AND
(VII) REDUCING FAMILY VIOLENCE.
(D) THE SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL:
(1) BE VOLUNTARY AND CARRY NO NEGATIVE CONSEQUENCES FOR A
FAMILY THAT DECLINES TO PARTICIPATE;
(2) BE OFFERED IN EVERY COMMUNITY IN THE STATE;
(3) INCLUDE AN EVIDENCE–BASED ASSESSMENT OF THE PHYSICAL,
SOCIAL, AND EMOTIONAL FACTORS AFFECTING THE FAMILY;
(4) BE OFFERED TO ALL FAMILIES WITH NEWBORNS RESIDING IN THE
COMMUNITY WHERE THE PROGRAM OPERATES;

SENATE BILL 156 7
(5) INCLUDE AT LEAST ONE VISIT DURING A NEWBORN’S FIRST 12
WEEKS OF LIFE WITH THE OPPORTUNITY FOR THE FAMILY TO RECEIVE UP TO THREE
ADDITIONAL VISITS DURING A NEWBORN’S FIRST 12 WEEKS OF LIFE;
(6) INCLUDE A FOLLOW–UP CALL OR SURVEY NOT LATER THAN 3
MONTHS AFTER THE LAST VISIT; AND
(7) PROVIDE INFORMATION AND REFERRALS TO ADDRESS EACH
FAMILY’S IDENTIFIED AND SPECIFIC NEEDS.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH BY REGULATION:
(I) THE DEFINITION OF A “COMMUNITY” FOR PURPOSES OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SELECTION PROCESS FOR A COMMUNITY LEAD TO MEET THE
NEEDS OF THE DESIGNATED GEOGRAPHIC AREA.
(2) ENTITIES ELIGIBLE TO BE SELECTED TO SERVE AS A COMMUNITY
LEAD INCLUDE:
(I) LOCAL PUBLIC HEALTH AGENCIES;
(II) LOCAL GOVERNMENTS;
(III) BIRTHING FACILITIES;
(IV) NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS SPECIALIZING IN EARLY
CHILDHOOD DEVELOPMENT OR MATERNAL AND POSTPARTUM HEALTH; OR
(V) OTHER ORGANIZATIONS AS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(3) A COMMUNITY LEAD SHALL:
(I) IMPLEMENT A UNIVERSALLY OFFERED NEWBORN NURSE
HOME VISITING SERVICES MODEL THAT HAS BEEN REVIEWED BY THE FEDERAL
ADMINISTRATION FOR CHILDREN AND FAMILIES TO MEET THE U.S. DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES CRITERIA FOR AN EVIDENCE–BASED EARLY
CHILDHOOD HOME VISITING SERVICE DELIVERY MODEL;
(II) COORDINATE WITH ALL CERTIFIED PROVIDERS IN ITS
IDENTIFIED COMMUNITY SO THAT ALL FAMILIES WITH NEWBORNS ARE CONTACTED

SENATE BILL 156
NOT LATER THAN 2 WEEKS AFTER THE BIRTH OF THE NEWBORN AND OFFERED
SERVICES;
(III) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT STRATEGIES IN
COLLABORATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT TO OBTAIN FUNDING TO FACILITATE THE
PROVISION OF NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES;
(IV) COLLABORATE WITH OTHER HOME VISITING PROVIDERS TO
INTEGRATE NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES INTO THE EXISTING
SERVICES FOR FAMILIES IN THE IDENTIFIED COMMUNITY SO THAT A COORDINATED
SYSTEM OF SUPPORT IS IN PLACE;
(V) MAINTAIN A WRITTEN PLAN DESCRIBING HOW THE
COMMUNITY LEAD WILL COMPLY WITH ITEMS (I) THROUGH (IV) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH;
(VI) CONSIDER INPUT FROM AN ADVISORY BOARD ESTABLISHED
BY THE COMMUNITY LEAD THAT:
1. INCLUDES STAKEHOLDERS FROM THE IDENTIFIED
COMMUNITY WITH REPRESENTATION FROM THE FOLLOWING WHERE APPLICABLE:
A. PARENTS;
B. MEDICAL PROVIDERS;
C. HOSPITALS;
D. SOCIAL SERVICE PROVIDERS SERVICING FAMILIES;
E. THE FEDERAL SPECIAL SUPPLEMENTAL FOOD
PROGRAM FOR WOMEN, INFANTS, AND CHILDREN;
F. CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES;
G. EARLY LEARNING HUBS;
H. TRIBAL LEADERSHIP;
I. LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENTS;
J. MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS;
K. INSURERS; AND

SENATE BILL 156 9
L. NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICE
PROVIDERS AND OTHER HOME VISITING PROVIDERS; AND
2. MEETS AT LEAST QUARTERLY AND DISTRIBUTES
MEETING MINUTES TO BOARD MEMBERS AND CERTIFIED PROVIDERS IN THE
IDENTIFIED COMMUNITY;
(VII) ENSURE LOCAL COMMUNITY RESOURCES ARE:
1. COMPILED IN A WEB–BASED FORMAT OR PRINTED
DIRECTORY; AND
2. UPDATED AT LEAST QUARTERLY FOR USE BY SERVICE
PROVIDERS;
(VIII) ENGAGE IN QUALITY ASSURANCE ACTIVITIES THAT
INCLUDE:
1. A MONTHLY REVIEW OF DATA INCLUDING KEY
PERFORMANCE INDICATORS SUCH AS SCHEDULING RATE, COMPREHENSIVE
NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISIT COMPLETION RATE, FOLLOW–UP RATE,
DEMOGRAPHIC PROFILE OF FAMILIES RECEIVING SERVICES, AND COMMUNITY
CONNECTIONS AND REFERRALS IN THE IDENTIFIED COMMUNITY;
2. A MONTHLY REVIEW OF FEEDBACK FROM THE
FAMILIES SERVED BY THE UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING PROGRAM
IN THE IDENTIFIED COMMUNITY USING STANDARDIZED METHODOLOGY; AND
3. MONITORING PROGRAM REACH IN THE IDENTIFIED
COMMUNITY MEASURED BY THE RATIO OF THE NUMBER OF COMPLETED
COMPREHENSIVE NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITS TO TOTAL BIRTHS IN THE
IDENTIFIED COMMUNITY, TAKING INTO CONSIDERATION THE NUMBER OF BIRTHS
SERVED BY OTHER HOME VISITING PROVIDERS;
(IX) PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT ACCESS TO DATA FOR
PROGRAM MONITORING AND EVALUATION IN A MANNER AND FORMAT DETERMINED
BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(X) COORDINATE WITH THE DEPARTMENT TO ADDRESS
QUALITY IMPROVEMENT NEEDS;

SENATE BILL 156
(XI) ON A QUARTERLY BASIS, SUBMIT THE FOLLOWING
DE–IDENTIFIED DATA ELECTRONICALLY TO THE DEPARTMENT IN A MANNER AND
FORMAT DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT:
1. THE NUMBER OF INFANTS BORN DURING THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING QUARTER WHO RESIDE IN THE IDENTIFIED COMMUNITY;
AND
2. FOR EACH CERTIFIED PROVIDER IN THE IDENTIFIED
COMMUNITY:
A. SCHEDULING RATE;
B. COMPREHENSIVE NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISIT
COMPLETION RATE;
C. FOLLOW–UP RATE;
D. DEMOGRAPHIC PROFILE OF FAMILIES RECEIVING
NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING;
E. COMMUNITY CONNECTIONS AND REFERRALS;
F. FEEDBACK FROM FAMILIES AND REFERRAL PARTNER
FEEDBACK; AND
G. ANY OTHER DATA IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
AND
(XII) COLLABORATE AND COORDINATE WITH TRIBES
DESIGNATED AS COMMUNITY LEADS OPERATING IN THE SAME GEOGRAPHIC AREA.
(F) IN COLLABORATION WITH THE MARYLAND INSURANCE
ADMINISTRATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS CONSISTENT
WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE ESTABLISHING:
(1) CRITERIA FOR UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING
SERVICES THAT ARE REQUIRED TO BE COVERED BY ENTITIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 15–861 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE; AND
(2) THE AMOUNT OF REIMBURSEMENT TO BE PAID TO A PROVIDER OF
UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES OR A METHODOLOGY TO
REIMBURSE THE COST OF PROVIDING UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING
SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–861 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 156 11
(G) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT BY REGULATION ANY REASONABLE
REIMBURSEMENT METHODOLOGY, INCLUDING:
(1) VALUE–BASED PAYMENTS;
(2) A CLAIM INVOICING PROCESS;
(3) CAPITATED PAYMENT;
(4) A REIMBURSEMENT METHODOLOGY THAT TAKES INTO ACCOUNT
THE NEED FOR A COMMUNITY–BASED ENTITY PROVIDING UNIVERSAL NEWBORN
NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES TO EXPAND THE ENTITY’S CAPACITY TO PROVIDE
THE SERVICES AND ADDRESS HEALTH DISPARITIES; OR
(5) ANY OTHER METHODOLOGY AGREED TO BY A CARRIER AND THE
PROVIDER OF THE UNIVERSAL NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES.
(H) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) COLLECT AND ANALYZE DATA GENERATED BY THE PROGRAM TO
ASSESS THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE PROGRAM IN MEETING THE AIMS DESCRIBED
IN SUBSECTION (C)(7) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) COORDINATE WITH OTHER STATE AGENCIES TO DEVELOP
PROTOCOLS FOR SHARING DATA, INCLUDING THE TIMELY SHARING OF DATA WITH
PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS OF THE FAMILIES WITH NEWBORNS RECEIVING THE
SERVICES.
(I) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH THE FORM AND MANNER IN
WHICH DATA REQUIRED UNDER § 15–861 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE SHALL BE
SUBMITTED.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL USE THE DATA REQUIRED UNDER §
15–861 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE TO MONITOR THE PROVISION OF UNIVERSAL
NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES.
(J) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
(K) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE
HOUSE HEALTH AND GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE STATUS OF THE

SENATE BILL 156
PROVISION OF UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES IN THE
STATE.
Article – Insurance
15–861.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(B) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE AND
REIMBURSEMENT IN FULL FOR THE COST TO A PROVIDER FOR DELIVERING
UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES AS REQUIRED BY THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH UNDER § 13–5502(F) OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE A COPAYMENT,
COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT ON COVERAGE FOR UNIVERSAL
NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES.
(2) IF AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE IS COVERED UNDER A
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN, AS DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. § 223, AN ENTITY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY SUBJECT COVERAGE FOR UNIVERSAL NEWBORN
NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES TO THE DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT OF THE
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE PLAN.
(D) AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO RECEIVE
UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES AS A CONDITION OF
COVERAGE AND MAY NOT BE PENALIZED OR IN ANY WAY DISCOURAGED FROM
DECLINING THE SERVICES.
(E) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL NOTIFY AN INSURED OR
ENROLLEE ABOUT THE UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES
WHENEVER AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE ADDS A NEWBORN TO COVERAGE.

SENATE BILL 156 13
(F) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY USE IN–NETWORK
PROVIDERS OR CONTRACT WITH LOCAL PUBLIC HEALTH AUTHORITIES TO PROVIDE
UNIVERSAL NEWBORN NURSE HOME VISITING SERVICES.
(G) ENTITIES SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL REPORT TO THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, IN THE FORM AND MANNER REQUIRED BY
THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH UNDER § 13–5502 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE, DATA REGARDING CLAIMS SUBMITTED FOR
SERVICES COVERED UNDER THIS SECTION TO MONITOR THE PROVISION OF THE
SERVICES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department of
Health may apply for a waiver under 42 U.S.C. 18052 to obtain federal financial
participation in the cost of services provided under Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.